Washington statutes.
RCW 19.355.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Local telephone directory" means a publication listing telephone numbers for various businesses in a certain geographic area and distributed free of charge to some or all telephone subscribers in that area.

(2) "Local telephone number" means a telephone number that can be dialed without incurring long distance charges from telephones located within the area covered by the local telephone directory in which the number is listed. The term does not include long distance numbers, toll-free numbers, or nine hundred exchange numbers listed in a local telephone directory.

(3) "Locksmith services" means:

(a) Selling, installing, servicing, repairing, repinning, recombinating, and adjusting locks, safes, vaults, or safe deposit boxes;

(b) Originating keys;

(c) Operating, bypassing, or neutralizing locks, safes, vaults, or safe deposit boxes;

(d) Creating, documenting, selling, installing, managing, and servicing master-key systems;

(e) Unlocking, bypassing, or neutralizing locks for motor vehicles;

(f) Originating keys for motor vehicles, which can include the programming, reprogramming, or bypassing of any security transponder, immobilizer system, or subsequent technology built by the manufacturer; and

(g) Keying or recombinating motor vehicle locks.

(4) "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation, or limited liability corporation.

[ 2015 c 28 s 1.]